Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202647-1107
Individualized release plan; required; release; conditions.

(1) The department shall require each community work release and reentry center to establish an individualized release plan for each committed offender assigned to the center. The staff of a center shall assist the department in making reasonable advance preparations for the release of such committed offenders.

(2) If a parole-eligible committed offender is released from a center, the offender shall be subject to parole conditions set by the board and under the supervision of a district parole officer assigned pursuant to section 83-1,104. The individualized release plan for a parole-eligible committed offender shall be developed in coordination with the assigned district parole officer.

(3) If a committed offender whose sentence includes a term of post-release supervision is released from a center, the offender shall be subject to the conditions of his or her order of post-release supervision and under the supervision of a district probation officer. The individualized release plan for such an offender shall be developed in coordination with the assigned district probation officer.

Laws 2024, LB631, § 7;

Laws 2025, LB150, § 64.